South Dakota, session 2026, HB1307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-6-158 be AMENDED:
10-6-158. For taxes payable in 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, and 2031, the total The
assessed value of all property in a county with an owner-occupied single-family dwelling
classification, as defined in § 10-13-39, may not increase more than three percent over
the total assessed value of all property in the county with an the owner-occupied single-
family dwelling classification in the prior year, except as otherwise provided in this section.
A county may further increase the total The assessed value of all property with an
owner-occupied single-family dwelling classification may be further increased by an
amount equal to the assessed value of all new improvements of a new improvement made
to the owner-occupied single-family dwellings or property reclassified to the owner-
occupied single-family dwelling classification in the county in the prior dwelling in that
year.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a county must adjust the total
assessed value of all property with an owner-occupied single-family dwelling classification
pursuant to § 10-6-121.
Section 2. This Act is effective beginning July 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.